Connecticut, session 2026, HB05219.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) In case of the death,
2 resignation, refusal to serve or removal from the office of Governor and:
3 (1) There is a vacancy in the office of Lieutenant Governor such that
4 no person is able to succeed to the office of Governor in accordance with
5 subsection a. of article twenty-second of the amendments to the
6 Constitution of the state, and there is a vacancy in the office of president
7 pro tempore of the Senate due to the Senate not electing one of its
8 members president pro tempore in accordance with section 19 or 20 of
9 article fourth of the Constitution of the state such that no person is able
10 to succeed to the office of Lieutenant Governor in accordance with
11 section 19 of article fourth of the Constitution of the state, the speaker of
12 the House of Representatives shall, upon taking the oath of office of
sHB5219 / File No. 182 1

sHB5219 File No. 182
13 Governor, be Governor of the state until another is chosen at the next
14 regular election for Governor and is duly qualified;
15 (2) In addition to the vacancies set forth in subdivision (1) of this
16 subsection, (A) there is a vacancy in the office of speaker of the House
17 of Representatives, (B) the speaker of the House of Representatives
18 refuses to take the oath of office of Governor or is unable to take such
19 oath due to absence from the state, or (C) the speaker of the House of
20 Representatives is ineligible for the office of Governor or otherwise
21 unable to serve in such capacity, the Treasurer shall, upon taking the
22 oath of office of Governor, be Governor of the state until another is
23 chosen at the next regular election for Governor and is duly qualified;
24 (3) In addition to the vacancies set forth in subdivisions (1) and (2) of
25 this subsection and any refusal or absence described in subdivision (2)
26 of this subsection, (A) there is a vacancy in the office of Treasurer, (B)
27 the Treasurer refuses to take the oath of office of Governor or is unable
28 to take such oath due to absence from the state, or (C) the Treasurer is
29 ineligible for the office of Governor or otherwise unable to serve in such
30 capacity, the Secretary of the State shall, upon taking the oath of office
31 of Governor, be Governor of the state until another is chosen at the next
32 regular election for Governor and is duly qualified;
33 (4) In addition to the vacancies set forth in subdivisions (1) to (3),
34 inclusive, of this subsection and any refusals or absences described in
35 subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection, (A) there is a vacancy in the
36 office of Secretary of the State, (B) the Secretary of the State refuses to
37 take the oath of office of Governor or is unable to take such oath due to
38 absence from the state, or (C) the Secretary of the State is ineligible for
39 the office of Governor or otherwise unable to serve in such capacity, the
40 Comptroller shall, upon taking the oath of office of Governor, be
41 Governor of the state until another is chosen at the next regular election
42 for Governor and is duly qualified;
43 (5) In addition to the vacancies set forth in subdivisions (1) to (4),
44 inclusive, of this subsection and any refusals or absences described in
45 subdivisions (2) to (4), inclusive, of this subsection, (A) there is a vacancy
sHB5219 / File No. 182 2

sHB5219 File No. 182
46 in the office of Comptroller, (B) the Comptroller refuses to take the oath
47 of office of Governor or is unable to take such oath due to absence from
48 the state, or (C) the Comptroller is ineligible for the office of Governor
49 or otherwise unable to serve in such capacity, the Attorney General
50 shall, upon taking the oath of office of Governor, be Governor of the
51 state until another is chosen at the next regular election for Governor
52 and is duly qualified;
53 (6) In addition to the vacancies set forth in subdivisions (1) to (5),
54 inclusive, of this subsection and any refusals or absences described in
55 subdivisions (2) to (5), inclusive, of this subsection, (A) there is a vacancy
56 in the office of Attorney General, (B) the Attorney General refuses to
57 take the oath of office of Governor or is unable to take such oath due to
58 absence from the state, or (C) the Attorney General is ineligible for the
59 office of Governor or otherwise unable to serve in such capacity, the
60 majority leader of the Senate shall, upon taking the oath of office of
61 Governor, be Governor of the state until another is chosen at the next
62 regular election for Governor and is duly qualified; and
63 (7) In addition to the vacancies set forth in subdivisions (1) to (6),
64 inclusive, of this subsection and any refusals or absences described in
65 subdivisions (2) to (6), inclusive, of this subsection (A) there is a vacancy
66 in the office of majority leader of the Senate, (B) the majority leader of
67 the Senate refuses to take the oath of office of Governor or is unable to
68 take such oath due to absence from the state, or (C) the majority leader
69 of the Senate is ineligible for the office of Governor or otherwise unable
70 to serve in such capacity, the majority leader of the House of
71 Representatives shall, upon taking the oath of office of Governor, be
72 Governor of the state until another is chosen at the next regular election
73 for Governor and is duly qualified.
74 (b) In case of the impeachment of the Governor or of the Governor's
75 absence from the state, and:
76 (1) There is a vacancy in the office of Lieutenant Governor such that
77 no person is able to act as Governor in accordance with subsection b. of
78 article twenty-second of the amendments to the Constitution of the
sHB5219 / File No. 182 3

sHB5219 File No. 182
79 state, and there is a vacancy in the office of president pro tempore of the
80 Senate due to the Senate not electing one of its members president pro
81 tempore in accordance with section 19 or 20 of article fourth of the
82 Constitution of the state such that no person is able to succeed to the
83 office of Lieutenant Governor in accordance with section 19 of article
84 fourth of the Constitution of the state, the speaker of the House of
85 Representatives shall exercise the powers and authority and perform the
86 duties appertaining to the office of Governor until, if the Governor has
87 been impeached, the Governor has been acquitted or, if absent, the
88 Governor has returned;
89 (2) In addition to the vacancies set forth in subdivision (1) of this
90 subsection, (A) there is a vacancy in the office of speaker of the House
91 of Representatives, (B) the speaker of the House of Representatives
92 refuses to exercise the powers and authority and perform the duties
93 appertaining to the office of Governor or is unable to so exercise and
94 perform due to absence from the state, or (C) the speaker of the House
95 of Representatives is ineligible for the office of Governor or otherwise
96 unable to serve in such capacity, the Treasurer shall exercise the powers
97 and authority and perform the duties appertaining to the office of
98 Governor until, if the Governor has been impeached, the Governor has
99 been acquitted or, if absent, the Governor has returned;
100 (3) In addition to the vacancies set forth in subdivisions (1) and (2) of
101 this subsection and any refusal or absence described in subdivision (2)
102 of this subsection, (A) there is a vacancy in the office of Treasurer, (B)
103 the Treasurer refuses to exercise the powers and authority and perform
104 the duties appertaining to the office of Governor or is unable to so
105 exercise and perform due to absence from the state, or (C) the Treasurer
106 is ineligible for the office of Governor or otherwise unable to serve in
107 such capacity, the Secretary of the State shall exercise the powers and
108 authority and perform the duties appertaining to the office of Governor
109 until, if the Governor has been impeached, the Governor has been
110 acquitted or, if absent, the Governor has returned;
111 (4) In addition to the vacancies set forth in subdivisions (1) to (3),
sHB5219 / File No. 182 4

sHB5219 File No. 182
112 inclusive, of this subsection and any refusals or absences described in
113 subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection, (A) there is a vacancy in the
114 office of Secretary of the State, (B) the Secretary of the State refuses to
115 exercise the powers and authority and perform the duties appertaining
116 to the office of Governor or is unable to so exercise and perform due to
117 absence from the state, or (C) the Secretary of the State is ineligible for
118 the office of Governor or otherwise unable to serve in such capacity, the
119 Comptroller shall exercise the powers and authority and perform the
120 duties appertaining to the office of Governor until, if the Governor has
121 been impeached, the Governor has been acquitted or, if absent, the
122 Governor has returned;
123 (5) In addition to the vacancies set forth in subdivisions (1) to (4),
124 inclusive, of this subsection and any refusals or absences described in
125 subdivisions (2) to (4), inclusive, of this subsection, (A) there is a vacancy
126 in the office of Comptroller, (B) the Comptroller refuses to exercise the
127 powers and authority and perform the duties appertaining to the office
128 of Governor or is unable to so exercise and perform due to absence from
129 the state, or (C) the Comptroller is ineligible for the office of Governor
130 or otherwise unable to serve in such capacity, the Attorney General shall
131 exercise the powers and authority and perform the duties appertaining
132 to the office of Governor until, if the Governor has been impeached, the
133 Governor has been acquitted or, if absent, the Governor has returned;
134 (6) In addition to the vacancies set forth in subdivisions (1) to (5),
135 inclusive, of this subsection and any refusals or absences described in
136 subdivisions (2) to (5), inclusive, of this subsection, (A) there is a vacancy
137 in the office of Attorney General, (B) the Attorney General refuses to
138 exercise the powers and authority and perform the duties appertaining
139 to the office of Governor or is unable to so exercise and perform due to
140 absence from the state, or (C) the Attorney General is ineligible for the
141 office of Governor or otherwise unable to serve in such capacity, the
142 majority leader of the Senate shall exercise the powers and authority and
143 perform the duties appertaining to the office of Governor until, if the
144 Governor has been impeached, the Governor has been acquitted or, if
145 absent, the Governor has returned; and
sHB5219 / File No. 182 5

sHB5219 File No. 182
146 (7) In addition to the vacancies set forth in subdivisions (1) to (6),
147 inclusive, of this subsection and any refusals or absences described in
148 subdivisions (2) to (6), inclusive, of this subsection, (A) there is a vacancy
149 in the office of majority leader of the Senate, (B) the majority leader of
150 the Senate refuses to exercise the powers and authority and perform the
151 duties appertaining to the office of Governor or is unable to so exercise
152 and perform due to absence from the state, or (C) the majority leader of
153 the Senate is ineligible for the office of Governor or otherwise unable to
154 serve in such capacity, the majority leader of the House of
155 Representatives shall exercise the powers and authority and perform the
156 duties appertaining to the office of Governor until, if the Governor has
157 been impeached, the Governor has been acquitted or, if absent, the
158 Governor has returned.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (a)(7), "of this subsection" was added before "(A) there is a
vacancy", for consistency with standard drafting conventions.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5219 / File No. 182 6

sHB5219 File No. 182
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill formalizes and expands the existing order of succession for
the Office of the Governor under certain conditions, resulting in no fiscal
impact to the state or municipalities.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sHB5219 / File No. 182 7

sHB5219 File No. 182
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5219
AN ACT CONCERNING THE ORDER OF GUBERNATORIAL
SUCCESSION UNDER CERTAIN PERMANENT AND TEMPORARY
CIRCUMSTANCES.